Utah statutes.
54-18-201.   Public utility to obtain approval for high voltage power lines.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a public utility shall comply with the requirements of this chapter before beginning construction or operation of:

(a)  a high voltage power line; or

(b)  an upgraded high voltage power line.

(2)  A public utility is not subject to the provisions of this chapter if the public utility has on or before May 12, 2009:

(a)  filed an application for or obtained a certificate of convenience and necessity for a high voltage power line in accordance with the provisions of Section 54-4-25; or

(b)  has initiated the acquisition of right-of-way for the construction of the high voltage transmission line.

(3)  A transmission line that is subject to federal permitting is not subject to the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 316, 2009 General Session

